Utah statutes.
23-23-9.   Agents -- Appointment -- Identification -- Refusal of entry by
agent.
(1)  A landowner association may appoint cooperative wildlife management unit
agents to protect private property of the cooperative wildlife management
unit.
(2)  Each cooperative wildlife management unit agent shall wear or have in his
or her possession a form of identification prescribed by the Wildlife Board
which indicates he or she is a cooperative wildlife management unit agent.
(3)  A cooperative wildlife management unit agent may refuse entry into
private lands within a cooperative wildlife management unit to any person,
except an owner of land within the unit and his or her employees, who:
(a)  does not have in his or her possession a cooperative wildlife management
unit authorization or permit;
(b)  endangers or has endangered human safety;
(c)  damages or has damaged private property within a cooperative wildlife
management unit; or
(d)  fails or has failed to comply with reasonable rules of a landowner
association.
(4)  In performing the functions described in this section, a cooperative
wildlife management unit agent shall comply with the relevant laws of this
state.
